Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 7. Employee Rights.

Sec. 23.10.430.
Access to personnel files.

An employer shall permit an employee or former employee to inspect and make copies of the employee’s personnel file and other personnel information maintained by the employer concerning the employee under reasonable rules during regular business hours. The employer may require an employee or former employee who requests copies of material under this subsection to pay the reasonable cost of duplication.

This section does not supersede the terms of a collective bargaining agreement.

In this section,

“employee” means a person employed by an employer;

“employer” means a person who employs one or more other persons and includes the state, the University of Alaska, the Alaska Railroad, and political subdivisions of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 24 SLA 1989)

Collateral references. —

Validity and construction of statute giving employee the right to review and comment upon personnel record maintained by employer. 64 ALR4th 619.

Sec. 23.10.440.
Posting of information on sexual harassment. [Repealed, § 2 ch 65 SLA 1992.]